New York, session 2025-2026, A10738.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (viii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of 2 subsection (a) of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 2 of 3 part B of chapter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (viii) For taxable years beginning after two thousand twenty-six and 5 before two thousand thirty-three the following rates and dollar amounts 6 shall apply, provided however that such dollar amounts shall be adjusted 7 by the cost of living adjustment prescribed in section six hundred one-a 8 of this part: 9 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 10 Not over $17,150 3.80% of the New York taxable 11 income 12 Over $17,150 but not over $23,600 $652 plus 4.30% of excess over 13 $17,150 14 Over $23,600 but not over $27,900 $929 plus 5.05% of excess over 15 $23,600 16 Over $27,900 but not over $161,550 $1,146 plus 5.30% of excess over 17 $27,900 18 Over $161,550 but not over $323,200 $8,229 plus 5.80% of excess 19 over $161,550 20 Over $323,200 but not over $17,605 plus 6.85% of excess 21 $2,155,350 over $323,200 22 Over $2,155,350 but not over $143,107 plus 9.65% of excess 23 $5,000,000 over $2,155,350 24 Over $5,000,000 but not over $417,616 plus 10.30% of excess 25 $25,000,000 over $5,000,000 26 Over $25,000,000 $2,477,616 plus 10.90% of excess 27 over $25,000,000 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14557-01-6 A. 10738 2 1 § 2. Clause (ix) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (a) 2 of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 2 of part B of chap- 3 ter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (ix) For taxable years beginning after two thousand thirty-two the 5 following rates and dollar amounts shall apply, provided however that 6 such dollar amounts shall be adjusted by the cost of living adjustment 7 prescribed in section six hundred one-a of this part: 8 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 9 Not over $17,150 3.80% of the New York taxable 10 income 11 Over $17,150 but not over $23,600 $652 plus 4.30% of excess over 12 $17,150 13 Over $23,600 but not over $27,900 $929 plus 5.05% of excess over 14 $23,600 15 Over $27,900 but not over $161,550 $1,146 plus 5.30% of excess over 16 $27,900 17 Over $161,550 but not over $323,200 $8,229 plus 5.80% of excess 18 over $161,550 19 Over $323,200 but not over $17,605 plus 6.85% of excess 20 $2,155,350 over $323,200 21 Over $2,155,350 $143,107 plus 8.82% of excess 22 over $2,155,350 23 § 3. Clause (viii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection 24 (b) of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 4 of part B of 25 chapter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 (viii) For taxable years beginning after two thousand twenty-six and 27 before two thousand thirty-three the following rates and dollar amounts 28 shall apply, provided however that such dollar amounts shall be adjusted 29 by the cost of living adjustment prescribed in section six hundred one-a 30 of this part: 31 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 32 Not over $12,800 3.80% of the New York taxable 33 income 34 Over $12,800 but not over $486 plus 4.30% of excess over 35 $17,650 $12,800 36 Over $17,650 but not over $695 plus 5.05% of excess over 37 $20,900 $17,650 38 Over $20,900 but not over $859 plus 5.30% of excess over 39 $107,650 $20,900 40 Over $107,650 but not over $5,457 plus 5.80% of excess 41 $269,300 over $107,650 42 Over $269,300 but not over $14,833 plus 6.85% of excess 43 $1,616,450 over $269,300 44 Over $1,616,450 but not over $107,113 plus 9.65% of excess 45 $5,000,000 over $1,616,450 46 Over $5,000,000 but not over $433,626 plus 10.30% of excess 47 $25,000,000 over $5,000,000 48 Over $25,000,000 $2,493,626 plus 10.90% of excess 49 over $25,000,000 50 § 4. Clause (ix) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (b) 51 of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 4 of part B of chap- 52 ter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 53 (ix) For taxable years beginning after two thousand thirty-two the 54 following rates and dollar amounts shall apply, provided however that A. 10738 3 1 such dollar amounts shall be adjusted by the cost of living adjustment 2 prescribed in section six hundred one-a of this part: 3 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 4 Not over $12,800 3.80% of the New York taxable 5 income 6 Over $12,800 but not over $486 plus 4.30% of excess over 7 $17,650 $12,800 8 Over $17,650 but not over $695 plus 5.05% of excess over 9 $20,900 $17,650 10 Over $20,900 but not over $859 plus 5.30% of excess over 11 $107,650 $20,900 12 Over $107,650 but not over $5,457 plus 5.80% of excess 13 $269,300 over $107,650 14 Over $269,300 but not over $14,833 plus 6.85% of excess 15 $1,616,450 over $269,300 16 Over $1,616,450 $107,113 plus 8.82% of excess 17 over $1,616,450 18 § 5. Clause (viii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection 19 (c) of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 6 of part B of 20 chapter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 (viii) For taxable years beginning after two thousand twenty-six and 22 before two thousand thirty-three the following rates and dollar amounts 23 shall apply, provided however that such dollar amounts shall be adjusted 24 by the cost of living adjustment prescribed in section six hundred one-a 25 of this part: 26 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 27 Not over $8,500 3.80% of the New York taxable income 28 Over $8,500 but not over $11,700 $323 plus 4.30% of excess over 29 $8,500 30 Over $11,700 but not over $13,900 $461 plus 5.05% of excess over 31 $11,700 32 Over $13,900 but not over $80,650 $572 plus 5.30% of excess over 33 $13,900 34 Over $80,650 but not over $215,400 $4,110 plus 5.80% of excess 35 over $80,650 36 Over $215,400 but not over $11,926 plus 6.85% of excess 37 $1,077,550 over $215,400 38 Over $1,077,550 but not over $70,983 plus 9.65% of excess 39 $5,000,000 over $1,077,550 40 Over $5,000,000 but not over $449,499 plus 10.30% of excess 41 $25,000,000 over $5,000,000 42 Over $25,000,000 $2,509,499 plus 10.90% of excess 43 over $25,000,000 44 § 6. Clause (ix) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (c) 45 of section 601 of the tax law, as added by section 6 of part B of chap- 46 ter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 47 (ix) For taxable years beginning after two thousand thirty-two the 48 following rates and dollar amounts shall apply, provided however that 49 such dollar amounts shall be adjusted by the cost of living adjustment 50 prescribed in section six hundred one-a of this part: 51 If the New York taxable income is: The tax is: 52 Not over $8,500 3.80% of the New York taxable income 53 Over $8,500 but not over $11,700 $323 plus 4.30% of excess over A. 10738 4 1 $8,500 2 Over $11,700 but not over $13,900 $461 plus 5.05% of excess over 3 $11,700 4 Over $13,900 but not over $80,650 $572 plus 5.30% of excess over 5 $13,900 6 Over $80,650 but not over $215,400 $4,110 plus 5.80% of excess 7 over $80,650 8 Over $215,400 but not over $11,926 plus 6.85% of excess 9 $1,077,550 over $215,400 10 Over $1,077,550 $70,983 plus 8.82% of excess 11 over $1,077,550 12 § 7. Section 601-a of the tax law, as added by section 9 of part A of 13 chapter 56 of the laws of 2011, subsection (a) as amended by section 10 14 of part FF of chapter 59 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 § 601-a. Cost of living adjustment. (a) For tax year two thousand 17 thirteen, the commissioner, not later than September first, two thousand 18 twelve, shall multiply the amounts specified in subsection (b) of this 19 section for tax year two thousand twelve by one plus the cost of living 20 adjustment described in subsection (c) of this section. For tax year two 21 thousand fourteen, the commissioner, not later than September first, two 22 thousand thirteen, shall multiply the amounts specified in subsection 23 (b) of this section for tax year two thousand thirteen by one plus the 24 cost of living adjustment. For each succeeding tax year after tax year 25 two thousand fourteen and before tax year two thousand eighteen, the 26 commissioner, not later than September first of such tax year, shall 27 multiply the amounts specified in subsection (b) of this section for 28 such tax year by one plus the cost of living adjustment described in 29 subsection (c) of this section for such tax year. For tax year two 30 thousand twenty-seven, the commissioner, not later than September first, 31 two thousand twenty-six, shall multiply the amounts specified in 32 subsection (b) of this section for such tax year by one plus the cost of 33 living adjustment described in subsection (c) of this section for the 34 tax year. For each tax year succeeding tax year two thousand twenty-sev- 35 en, the commissioner shall complete the multiplication described herein 36 no later than September first of the year prior. 37 (b) The following amounts shall be indexed by the cost of living 38 adjustment. 39 (1) The dollar amounts in the tax tables set forth in paragraph one of 40 subsection (a), paragraph one of subsection (b) and paragraph one of 41 subsection (c) of section six hundred one of this part. For tax years 42 beginning on or after two thousand twenty-seven and before tax year two 43 thousand thirty-three, the dollar amounts in the tax tables set forth in 44 clause (viii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (a), 45 clause (viii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (b), 46 and clause (viii) of paragraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (c) of 47 section six hundred one of this part shall be indexed by the cost of 48 living adjustment. For tax years beginning on or after two thousand 49 thirty-two, the dollar amounts in the tax tables set forth in clause 50 (ix) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (a), clause (ix) 51 of subparagraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (b), and clause (ix) 52 of subparagraph (B) of paragraph one of subsection (c) of section six 53 hundred one of this part shall be indexed by the cost of living adjust- 54 ment. A. 10738 5 1 (2) The dollar amount in the numerator of the fractions in subsection 2 (d) of section six hundred one of this part that is not fifty thousand 3 dollars. For tax years beginning on or after two thousand twenty-seven 4 and before tax year two thousand thirty-three, the dollar amount in the 5 numerator of the fractions in subsection (d-6) of section six hundred 6 one of this part that is not fifty thousand dollars shall be indexed by 7 the cost of living adjustment. For tax years beginning on or after two 8 thousand thirty-three, the dollar amount in the numerator of the frac- 9 tions in subsection (d-7) of section six hundred one of this part that 10 is not fifty thousand dollars shall be indexed by the cost of living 11 adjustment. 12 (3) The New York standard deduction of a resident individual in 13 section six hundred fourteen of this article. 14 (c) The cost of living adjustment for a tax year is the percentage if 15 any, by which the average monthly value of the consumer price index for 16 the twelve month period ending on June thirtieth of the year immediately 17 preceding the tax year for which the adjustment is being made (referred 18 to as the adjustment year) exceeds the average monthly value of the 19 consumer price index for the twelve month period ending on June thirti- 20 eth of the year immediately preceding the adjustment year. For purposes 21 of this section, the consumer price index means the consumer price index 22 for all urban consumers published by the United States department of 23 labor. 24 (d) If the product of the amounts in subsection (b) and subsection (c) 25 of this section is not a multiple of fifty dollars, such increase shall 26 be rounded to the next lowest multiple of fifty dollars. Provided, 27 however, that for tax years beginning on or after two thousand twenty- 28 seven, if the product of the amounts in subsections (b) and (c) of this 29 section is not a multiple of fifty dollars. such increase shall be 30 rounded to the next highest multiple of fifty dollars. 31 § 8. Section 614 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 170 of the laws 32 of 1994, subsection (a) as amended by section 1 of part JJ of chapter 59 33 of the laws of 2018, subsections (b) and (d) as amended by section 1 of 34 part C of chapter 62 of the laws of 2006 and subsection (f) as amended 35 by section 11 of part FF of chapter 59 of the laws of 2013, is amended 36 to read as follows: 37 § 614. New York standard deduction of a resident individual. (a) 38 Unmarried individual. For taxable years beginning on or after two thou- 39 sand twenty-seven, the New York standard deduction of a resident indi- 40 vidual who is not married nor the head of a household nor a surviving 41 spouse nor an individual who is claimed as a dependent by another New 42 York state taxpayer shall be eight thousand dollars. For taxable years 43 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-six, the New York standard 44 deduction of a resident individual who is not married nor the head of a 45 household nor a surviving spouse nor an individual who is claimed as a 46 dependent by another New York state taxpayer shall be seven thousand 47 five hundred dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred 48 ninety-six, such standard deduction shall be seven thousand four hundred 49 dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred ninety-five, 50 such standard deduction shall be six thousand six hundred dollars; and 51 for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-nine and 52 before nineteen hundred ninety-five, such standard deduction shall be 53 six thousand dollars. 54 (b) [Husband and wife] Spouses filing jointly and surviving spouse. 55 For taxable years beginning on or after two thousand twenty-seven, the 56 New York standard deduction of spouses whose New York taxable income is A. 10738 6 1 determined jointly or a surviving spouse shall be sixteen thousand fifty 2 dollars. For taxable years beginning after two thousand five, the New 3 York standard deduction of [a husband and wife] spouses whose New York 4 taxable income is determined jointly or a surviving spouse shall be 5 fifteen thousand dollars; for taxable years beginning after two thousand 6 two and before two thousand six, such standard deduction shall be four- 7 teen thousand six hundred dollars; for taxable years beginning in two 8 thousand two, such standard deduction shall be fourteen thousand two 9 hundred dollars; for taxable years beginning in two thousand one, such 10 standard deduction shall be thirteen thousand four hundred dollars; for 11 taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-six and before two 12 thousand one, such standard deduction shall be thirteen thousand 13 dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred ninety-six, 14 such standard deduction shall be twelve thousand three hundred fifty 15 dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred ninety-five, 16 such standard deduction shall be ten thousand eight hundred dollars; and 17 for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-nine and 18 before nineteen hundred ninety-five, such standard deduction shall be 19 nine thousand five hundred dollars. 20 (c) Head of household. For taxable years beginning on or after two 21 thousand twenty-seven, the New York standard deduction of an individual 22 who is a head of household shall be eleven thousand two hundred dollars. 23 For taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-six, the New 24 York standard deduction of an individual who is a head of household 25 shall be ten thousand five hundred dollars; for taxable years beginning 26 in nineteen hundred ninety-six, such standard deduction shall be ten 27 thousand dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred nine- 28 ty-five, such standard deduction shall be eight thousand one hundred 29 fifty dollars; and for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred 30 eighty-nine and before nineteen hundred ninety-five, such standard 31 deduction shall be seven thousand dollars. 32 (d) Married individuals filing separately. For taxable years begin- 33 ning on or after two thousand twenty-seven, the New York standard 34 deduction of a married individual filing a separate return shall be 35 eight thousand dollars. For taxable years beginning after two thousand 36 five, the New York standard deduction of a married individual filing a 37 separate return shall be seven thousand five hundred dollars; for taxa- 38 ble years beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-six and before two 39 thousand six, such standard deduction shall be six thousand five hundred 40 dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred ninety-six, 41 such standard deduction shall be six thousand one hundred seventy-five 42 dollars; for taxable years beginning in nineteen hundred ninety-five, 43 such standard deduction shall be five thousand four hundred dollars; and 44 for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-nine and 45 before nineteen hundred ninety-five, such standard deduction shall be 46 four thousand seven hundred fifty dollars. 47 (e) Standard deduction of a dependent individual. For taxable years 48 beginning on or after two thousand twenty-seven, the New York standard 49 deduction of a resident individual whose federal exemption amount is 50 zero shall be three thousand one hundred dollars. For taxable years 51 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-six, the New York standard 52 deduction of a resident individual whose federal exemption amount is 53 zero shall be three thousand dollars; for taxable years beginning in 54 nineteen hundred ninety-six, such standard deduction shall be two thou- 55 sand nine hundred dollars; and for taxable years beginning after nine- A. 10738 7 1 teen hundred eighty-nine and before nineteen hundred ninety-six, such 2 standard deduction shall be two thousand eight hundred dollars. 3 (f) Adjusted standard deduction. For taxable years beginning after two 4 thousand seventeen, the standard deductions set forth in this section 5 shall be the amounts set forth in this section adjusted by the cost of 6 living adjustment prescribed in section six hundred one-a of this [part] 7 article for tax years two thousand thirteen through two thousand seven- 8 teen. For taxable years beginning on or after two thousand twenty-sev- 9 en, the standard deductions set forth in this section shall be the 10 amounts set forth in this section adjusted by the cost of living adjust- 11 ment prescribed in section six hundred one-a of this article. 12 § 9. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 14 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 15 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 16 on or before such date.